Utah statutes.
41-22-10.8.   Protective headgear requirements -- Owner duty -- Penalty for
violation.
(1) A person under the age of 18 may not operate or ride on all-terrain type I
vehicles, snowmobiles, or motorcycles on public land unless the person is
wearing a properly fitted and fastened, United States Department of
Transportation safety-rated protective headgear designed for motorized vehicle
use.
(2)  The owner of an off-highway vehicle or any other person may not give
permission to a person who is under 18 years of age to operate or ride on an
off-highway vehicle in violation of this section.
(3) An operator and passengers of off-highway implements of husbandry operated
in the manner prescribed by Subsections 41-22-5.5(3) and (4) are exempt from
the requirements of this section.
(4)  Any person convicted of violations of this section is guilty of an
infraction and shall be fined not more than $50 per offense.
